Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 77. Smoke Detectors and Carbon Monoxide Detectors

§ 2881.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Single-family dwelling” means any building or structure in which a family, families, or households reside that contains sleeping facilities and is not otherwise classified as a “public building” as defined in

20 V.S.A. § 2730(a)

or as a “condominium” or “multiple unit dwelling” as defined in

20 V.S.A. § 2729(d)

.

“Smoke detector” means a device that detects visible or invisible particles of combustion and sounds a warning alarm, is operated from a power supply within the unit or wired to it from an outside source, and is approved or listed for the purpose by Underwriters Laboratory or by another nationally recognized independent testing laboratory.

“Carbon monoxide detector” means a device with an assembly that incorporates a sensor control component and an alarm notification that detects elevations in carbon monoxide levels and sounds a warning alarm, is operated from a power supply within the unit or wired to it from an outside source, and is approved or listed for the purpose by Underwriters Laboratory or by another nationally recognized independent testing laboratory.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 86

, § 1; amended

2005, No. 19

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2005.

§ 2882.
Installation.

A person who constructs a single-family dwelling shall install photoelectric-only-type smoke detectors in the vicinity of any bedrooms and on each level of the dwelling, and one or more carbon monoxide detectors in the vicinity of any bedrooms in the dwelling in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions. In a dwelling provided with electrical power, detectors shall be powered by the electrical service in the building and by battery.

Any single-family dwelling when transferred by sale or exchange shall contain photoelectric-only-type smoke detectors in the vicinity of any bedrooms and on each level of the dwelling installed in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions and one or more carbon monoxide detectors installed in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions. A single-family dwelling constructed before January 1, 1994 may contain smoke detectors powered by the electrical service in the building or by battery, or by a combination of both. In a single-family dwelling newly constructed after January 1, 1994 that is provided with electrical power, smoke detectors shall be powered by the electrical service in the building and by battery. In a single-family dwelling newly constructed after July 1, 2005 that is provided with electrical power, carbon monoxide detectors shall be powered by the electrical service in the building and by battery.

Nothing in this section shall require an owner or occupant of a single-family dwelling to maintain or use a smoke detector or a carbon monoxide detector after installation.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 86

§ 1; amended

2005, No. 19

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2005;

2007, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 29, 2008.

§ 2883.
Requirements for transfer of dwelling.

The seller of a single-family dwelling, including one constructed for first occupancy, whether the transfer is by sale or exchange, shall certify to the buyer at the closing of the transaction that the dwelling is provided with photoelectric-only-type smoke detectors and carbon monoxide detectors in accordance with this chapter. This certification shall be signed and dated by the seller.

If the buyer notifies the seller within 10 days by certified mail from the date of conveyance of the dwelling that the dwelling lacks any photoelectric-only-type smoke detectors, or any carbon monoxide detectors, or that any detector is not operable, the seller shall comply with this chapter within 10 days after notification.

Violation of this section or of the installation requirements of section 2882 of this title shall not create a defect in title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 86

§ 1; amended

2005, No. 19

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2005;

2007, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 29, 2008.